Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; FOUNDATIONAL PUBLIC HEALTH RESPONSIBILITIES.new text end new text begin $21,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $21,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for distribution to community health boards and Tribal governments for foundational public health responsibilities. Of these amounts: new text end new text begin (1) $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are for distribution to community health boards under Minnesota Statutes, section 145A.131, subdivision 1, paragraph (f), for foundational public health responsibilities as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 145A.131, subdivision 5, paragraph (b); and new text end new text begin (2) $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are for grants to Tribal governments under Minnesota Statutes, section 145A.14, subdivision 2b, for foundational public health responsibilities as defined by each Tribal government. new text end